Wisconsin, session 2025, AB544.
do enact as follows:AB544,11Section 1. 97.30 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:AB544,2,3297.30 (2m) Retail food establishment food safety grading system. (a) 3Definitions. In this subsection:AB544,2,541. “Food safety violation” means a violation of a provision of this chapter or a 5rule promulgated under this chapter.AB544,2,762. “Local health agent” means a local health department designated as an 7agent of the department under s. 97.41.AB544,3,58(b) Food safety grading system. The department shall establish and 1administer a uniform statewide food safety grading system for retail food 2establishments. The department shall base the grading system on a 100-point 3scale and shall categorize and assign negative point values that correspond to food 4safety violations that may occur at retail food establishments and that are based on 5the risk each food safety violation poses to public health.AB544,3,186(c) Inspections and grading. 1. Using the system developed under par. (b), the 7department or a local health agent shall conduct unannounced inspections of each 8retail food establishment licensed under sub. (2) at least once annually, and 9announced inspections of each retail food establishment licensed under sub. (2) as 10determined by the department, and, on the basis of each inspection conducted, 11determine if there is a food safety violation at the retail food establishment. If as a 12result of an inspection the department or local health agent determines that a food 13safety violation has occurred at the retail food establishment, the department or 14local health agent shall assign the retail food establishment a negative point value 15in accordance with the grading system developed by the department under par. (b). 16On the basis of any food safety violations found and corresponding negative point 17values assigned as a result of the inspection, the department or local health agent 18shall determine a grade for the retail food establishment as follows:AB544,3,1919a. The grade “A” for 90 to 100 points.AB544,3,2020b. The grade “B” for 80 to 89 points.AB544,3,2121c. The grade “C” for 70 to 79 points.AB544,3,2222d. The grade “Grade Pending” for 69 or fewer points.AB544,4,4232. If a retail food establishment receives a grade of “Grade Pending” as a 24result of an inspection conducted under subd. 1., the retail food establishment shall 1comply with the instruction of the department or local health agent on steps that 2the retail food establishment shall take for immediate corrective action, and the 3retail food establishment shall be subject to reinspection in accordance with a 4timeline chosen by the department or local health agent.AB544,4,75(d) Grade display. 1. A retail food establishment shall prominently display 6the most recent grade that it has received under par. (c) within 48 hours of receiving 7the grade and at all public entrances to the retail food establishment.AB544,4,1182. Subject to the period allowed under subd. 1., a retail food establishment 9may not post a grade that it has been assigned as a result of an inspection under 10par. (c) if the grade is not the most recent grade assigned to the retail food 11establishment by the department or a local health agent.AB544,4,15123. Subject to the period allowed under subd. 1., a retail food establishment 13may not indicate that the retail food establishment has received a grade regarding 14its food safety other than the one it has most recently been assigned as a result of an 15inspection under par. (c).AB544,4,1816(e) Reinspection. 1. A retail food establishment may within 30 days of 17receiving a grade under par. (c) request that the department or local health agent 18that provided the grade conduct a reinspection of the retail food establishment.AB544,4,20192. A retail food establishment’s request for a reinspection under subd. 1. does 20not relieve the retail food establishment from the requirements under par. (d).AB544,5,221(f) Penalty. A person that violates par. (d) may be subject to a warning from 22the department or a local health agent for a first violation, a $500 forfeiture for a 232nd violation committed within 12 months of a previous violation, and a $1,000 1forfeiture for a 3rd or subsequent violation committed within 12 months of any two 2previous violations.AB544,5,63(g) Public database. The department shall create and maintain an online 4database that is open to the public and that details the results of inspections 5conducted, negative point values assigned, and grades determined under par. (c) for 6each retail food establishment.AB544,5,97(h) Rulemaking and administration. 1. The department shall promulgate 8rules to administer this subsection within 6 months of the effective date of this 9subdivision .... [LRB inserts date].AB544,5,13102. The department shall ensure that the food safety grading system for retail 11food establishments authorized under par. (b) is created, administered, and 12enforced statewide within one year of the effective date of this subdivision .... [LRB 13inserts date].AB544,214Section 2. Nonstatutory provisions.AB544,5,2215(1) Emergency rulemaking. Using the procedure under s. 227.24, the 16department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection may promulgate the 17rules authorized under s. 97.30 (2m) (h) 1. as emergency rules. Notwithstanding s. 18227.24 (1) (a) and (3), the department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection 19is not required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule under this subsection 20as an emergency rule is necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, 21safety, or welfare and is not required to provide a finding of emergency for a rule 22promulgated under this subsection.AB544,5,2323